Maryland, session 2026, SB0867.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *sb0867*

SENATE BILL 867
Article – Economic Development
5–2601.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Commission” means the Maryland Aerospace and Technology Commission.
(c) “ELIGIBLE ENTITY” MEANS:
(1) A BUSINESS OR NONPROFIT ENTITY INVOLVED IN
AEROSPACE–RELATED TECHNOLOGIES;
(2) A GOVERNMENT ENTITY; OR
(3) AN INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION THAT CONDUCTS
AEROSPACE RESEARCH AND DEVELOPMENT WITHIN THE STATE.
(D) “Institution of higher education” means an educational institution in the State
that:
(1) by law or charter:
(i) is a public or nonprofit educational institution; and
(ii) is authorized to provide:
1. a program of education beyond the high school level and
award a bachelor’s or advanced degree; or
2. a program of 2 or more years’ duration that is accepted for
full credit toward a bachelor’s degree; and
(2) meets the standards and regulations that the Maryland Higher
Education Commission prescribes and is authorized to issue a certificate, diploma, or
degree under Title 12 of the Education Article.
[(d)] (E) “Zone” means an aerospace and technology zone designated under §
5–2607 of this subtitle.
5–2602.
(a) There is a Maryland Aerospace and Technology Commission in the
Department.

SENATE BILL 867 3
(b) The purpose of the Commission is to promote innovation in the fields of space
exploration, SPACE SCIENCE, SPACE TECHNOLOGY, AERONAUTICS, and commercial
aerospace opportunities, including the integration of space, aeronautics, and aviation
industries into the economy of the State.
5–2603.
(a) The Commission consists of the following members:
(1) the Secretary, or the Secretary’s designee;
(2) a member of the Senate FROM EACH DESIGNATED AEROSPACE
ZONE, appointed by the President of the Senate, who shall serve as [an] ex officio nonvoting
[member] MEMBERS;
(3) a member of the House of Delegates FROM EACH DESIGNATED
AEROSPACE ZONE, appointed by the Speaker of the House, who shall serve as [an] ex
officio nonvoting [member] MEMBERS;
(4) the Director of the National Aeronautics and Space Administration’s
Goddard Space Flight Center, or the Director’s designee, who shall serve as an ex officio
nonvoting member;
(5) the Administrator of the National Oceanic and Atmospheric
Administration, or the Administrator’s designee, who shall serve as an ex officio nonvoting
member;
(6) the Director of the [Federal Bureau of Investigation] NAVAL CENTER
FOR SPACE TECHNOLOGY OF THE NAVAL RESEARCH LAB, or the Director’s designee,
who shall serve as an ex officio nonvoting member;
(7) the [president of the Goddard Contractors’ Association] CHAIR OF THE
MARYLAND AEROSPACE ALLIANCE, or the [president’s] CHAIR’S designee;
(8) the President of the University of Maryland Baltimore County, or the
President’s designee;
(9) the President of the Southern Maryland Navy Alliance, or the
President’s designee;
(10) THE COMMAND MASTER CHIEF OF NAVAL AIR STATION
PATUXENT RIVER, OR THE MASTER CHIEF’S DESIGNEE, WHO SHALL SERVE AS AN
EX OFFICIO NONVOTING MEMBER;
(11) the president of the Maryland Space Business Roundtable, or the
president’s designee;

SENATE BILL 867
[(11)] (12) the President of the University of Maryland, College Park, or the
President’s designee;
[(12)] (13) the director of the Johns Hopkins Applied Physics Laboratory, or
the director’s designee;
[(13)] (14) the director of the Association of Universities for Research in
Astronomy, or the director’s designee;
[(14)] (15) the director of the Space Telescope Science Institute, or the
director’s designee;
(16) THE DIRECTOR OF THE MARYLAND SPACE GRANT CONSORTIUM,
OR THE DIRECTOR’S DESIGNEE;
(17) THE CHAIR OF THE MARYLAND AVIATION COMMISSION, OR THE
CHAIR’S DESIGNEE, WHO SHALL SERVE AS AN EX OFFICIO NONVOTING MEMBER;
(18) THE CHAIR OF THE MARYLAND ADVANCED AIR MOBILITY
COUNCIL, OR THE CHAIR’S DESIGNEE, WHO SHALL SERVE AS AN EX OFFICIO
NONVOTING MEMBER;
(19) THE CHIEF EXECUTIVE OFFICER OF MARYLAND TECHNOLOGY
DEVELOPMENT CORPORATION (TEDCO), OR THE CHIEF’S DESIGNEE;
(20) THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR OF THE MARYLAND ECONOMIC
DEVELOPMENT CORPORATION (MEDCO), OR THE DIRECTOR’S DESIGNEE; and
[(15)] (21) the following members, appointed by the Governor with the
advice and consent of the Senate:
(i) a representative of institutions of higher education;
(ii) [a] AN AEROSPACE representative of the National Society of
Black Engineers;
(iii) a representative of the Maryland aerospace manufacturing
community; [and]
(iv) [a representative] UP TO THREE TWO REPRESENTATIVES of
the aerospace technology industry; AND
(V) UP TO THREE TWO REPRESENTATIVES OF THE COMMERCIAL
SPACE INDUSTRY.

SENATE BILL 867 5
(b) A member of the Commission:
(1) may not receive compensation as a member of the Commission; but
(2) is entitled to reimbursement for expenses under the Standard State
Travel Regulations, as provided in the State budget.
(c) The Commission and its members are subject to the Maryland Public Ethics
Law.
(d) (1) The term of an appointed member is 4 years.
(2) The terms of the appointed members are staggered as required by the
terms provided for members on October 1, [2024] 2026.
(3) At the end of a term, a member continues to serve until a successor is
appointed and qualifies.
(4) A member who is appointed after a term has begun serves only for the
rest of the term until a successor is appointed and qualifies.
5–2604.
(A) (1) SUBJECT TO THE APPROVAL OF THE GOVERNOR, THE
COMMISSION SHALL APPOINT AN EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR.
(2) THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR SERVES AT THE PLEASURE OF THE
COMMISSION.
(3) THE COMMISSION SHALL DETERMINE THE SALARY OF THE
EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR.
(B) THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR, OR THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR’S
DESIGNEE, SHALL:
(1) SERVE AS THE CHIEF ADMINISTRATIVE OFFICER OF THE
COMMISSION;
(2) MANAGE THE ADMINISTRATIVE AFFAIRS AND TECHNICAL
ACTIVITIES OF THE COMMISSION IN ACCORDANCE WITH POLICIES AND
PROCEDURES THAT THE COMMISSION ESTABLISHES;
(3) MANAGE EXECUTION OF ALL PROJECTS AND INITIATIVES AS
CONSIDERED NECESSARY BY THE COMMISSION;

SENATE BILL 867
(4) ENSURE THAT GRANT PROPOSALS SUBMITTED TO THE
COMMISSION IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SUBTITLE ARE IN COMPLIANCE WITH THIS
SUBTITLE AND ANY REGULATIONS ADOPTED BY THE COMMISSION BEFORE THOSE
PROPOSALS ARE SUBMITTED TO THE COMMISSION FOR CONSIDERATION;
(5) APPROVE ALL SALARIES, PER DIEM PAYMENTS, AND ALLOWABLE
EXPENSES OF THE COMMISSION, THE EMPLOYEES OF THE COMMISSION, AND
CONSULTANTS OF THE COMMISSION;
(6) APPROVE ANY EXPENSES INCIDENTAL TO THE OPERATION OF THE
COMMISSION; AND
(7) PERFORM ANY OTHER DUTIES THAT THE COMMISSION DIRECTS IN
CARRYING OUT THIS SUBTITLE.
[(a)] (C) (1) The Department shall provide staff support to the Commission.
(2) THE STAFF OF THE COMMISSION SHALL:
(I) ATTEND ALL MEETINGS OF THE COMMISSION;
(II) ACT AS SECRETARY OF THE COMMISSION;
(III) KEEP MINUTES OF ALL PROCEEDINGS OF THE COMMISSION;
AND
(IV) CONNECT THE COMMISSION TO OTHER RELEVANT
ORGANIZATIONS WITHIN THE DEPARTMENT AND, OTHER STATE DEPARTMENTS,
THE MARYLAND TECHNOLOGY DEVELOPMENT CORPORATION, THE MARYLAND
ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT CORPORATION, AND LOCAL AGENCIES.
[(b)] (D) The Commission may retain consultants as necessary.
5–2605.
(A) The Commission shall:
(1) identify research and funding opportunities for entities in this State
that:
(i) strengthen and enhance the State’s leadership position in civil,
commercial, and military aerospace research and development;

SENATE BILL 867 7
[(ii) integrate the aerospace industry into the economy of the State;]
(II) ATTRACT INVESTMENT INTO THE STATE’S AEROSPACE
INDUSTRY WITH AN EMPHASIS ON COMMERCIALIZATION;
(III) PROVIDE TANGIBLE RECOMMENDATIONS;
[(iii)] (IV) capitalize, promote, and assist in the development AND
TRAINING of A DIVERSE workforce [training] to further the development of emerging
technologies required for all aspects of [space exploration] AEROSPACE; and
[(iv)] (V) develop public–private partnerships that advance both the
State’s aerospace industry and the surrounding community;
(2) establish advisory committees as needed;
(3) DEVELOP POLICY PROPOSALS TO IMPROVE THE STATE’S
ATTRACTIVENESS FOR THE GROWTH OF A VIBRANT AEROSPACE INDUSTRY;
[(3)] (4) develop aerospace–related educational opportunities within the
State in coordination with local educational institutions; and
[(4)] (5) develop and annually update a strategic plan developed in
accordance with § 5–2606 of this subtitle to implement the goals of the Commission.
(B) THE COMMISSION MAY PROVIDE GRANTS TO ELIGIBLE ENTITIES FOR
THE PURPOSE OF:
(1) DEVELOPMENT OF EMERGING AEROSPACE–RELATED
TECHNOLOGIES;
(2) RESEARCH INVOLVING ADVANCEMENT OF AEROSPACE–RELATED
TOPICS IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE STRATEGIC PLAN;
(3) WORKFORCE TRAINING TO ENABLE THE EXECUTION OF THE
ADVANCEMENT OF AEROSPACE–RELATED TOPICS IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE
STRATEGIC PLAN; AND
(4) DEVELOPMENT OF LOCAL INFRASTRUCTURE IMPROVEMENTS
THAT ENHANCE THE STATE’S ABILITY TO COMPETE IN THE AEROSPACE INDUSTRY.
(C) A GRANT AWARDED UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL BE CONSISTENT WITH
THE STRATEGIC PLAN DEVELOPED BY THE COMMISSION.

SENATE BILL 867
(D) THE COMMISSION SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO ESTABLISH:
(1) A COMPETITIVE GRANT APPLICATION PROCESS;
(2) CRITERIA AND PROCEDURES FOR MAKING GRANT AWARDS,
INCLUDING PRIVATE LEVERAGE REQUIREMENTS FOR GRANT AWARDS; AND
(3) PROCESSES AND METRICS FOR MONITORING THE SUCCESS AND
IMPACT OF GRANT AWARDS.
(E) FOR FISCAL YEAR 2028 AND EACH FISCAL YEAR THEREAFTER, THE
GOVERNOR SHALL INCLUDE IN THE ANNUAL BUDGET BILL AN APPROPRIATION OF
$30,000,000 TO THE COMMISSION FOR ADMINISTRATIVE COSTS AND MAKING
GRANTS.
5–2608.
(a) On or before [October] JULY 1 each year, the Commission shall submit a
report to the Governor, the Maryland Economic Development Commission, and, in
accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, the General Assembly.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the terms of the initial
members of the Maryland Aerospace and Technology Commission appointed under §
5–2603(a)(21)(ii), (iv) 5–2603(a)(15)(iv), and (v) of the Economic Development Article, as
enacted by Section 1 of this Act, shall expire as follows:
(1) two members in 2028; and
(2) two members in 2029; and
(3) two remaining members in 2030.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.